Utah statutes.
58-9-601.   Advance directions.

(1)  A person may provide written directions meeting the requirements of Subsection (2) to direct the preparation, type, and place of the person's disposition, including:

(a)  designating a funeral service establishment;

(b)  providing directions for burial arrangements; or

(c)  providing directions for cremation arrangements.

(2)  The written directions described in Subsection (1) shall contain:

(a)  the name and address of the decedent;

(b)  written directions regarding the decedent's disposition;

(c)  the signature of the decedent;

(d)  the signatures of at least two unrelated individuals, each of whom signed within a reasonable time after witnessing the signing of the form by the decedent; and

(e)  the date or dates the written directions were prepared and signed.

(3)  A funeral service director shall carry out the written directions of the decedent prepared under this section to the extent that:

(a)  the directions are lawful; and

(b)  the decedent has provided resources to carry out the directions.

(4)  Directions for disposition contained in a will shall be carried out pursuant to Subsection (3) regardless of:

(a)  the validity of other aspects of the will; or

(b)  the fact that the will may not be offered or admitted to probate until a later date.

(5)  A person may change or cancel written directions prepared under this section at any time prior to the person's death by providing written notice to all applicable persons, including:

(a)  if the written directions designate a funeral service establishment or funeral service director, the funeral service establishment or funeral service director designated in the written directions; and

(b)  if the written directions are contained in a will, the personal representative as defined in Section 75-1-201.

